src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
!! # Cornish numeral stems

LEXICON Numeral !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
NUM-PREFIXES  ;
ARABICS ;
Cardinals ;
Ordinals ;
ISOLATED-NUMEXP ;
ROMAN ;

LEXICON Cardinals !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
onan card-yow "one" ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
onen card-yow "one" ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
diw card-yow "two" ;
teyr card-yow "three" ;
trei card-yow "three" ;
pajar card-yow "four" ;
peder card-yow "four" ;
pajar-ugens card-yow "eighty" ;
pemp card-yow "five" ;
hwegh card-yow "six" ;
hwetek card-yow "sixteen" ;
seytek card-yow "seventeen" ;
seyth card-yow "seven" ;
etek card-yow "eighteen" ;
naw card-yow "nine" ;
udnek card-yow "eleven" ;
dewdhek card-yow "twelve" ;
terdhek card-yow "thirteen" ;
tredhek card-yow "thirteen" ;
pemdhek card-yow "fifteen" ;
trei-ugens card-yow "sixty" ;


LEXICON Ordinals !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
pajwora ord-yow "fourth" ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
pempes ord-yow "fifth" ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
hweghves ord-yow "sixth" ;
hweffes ord-yow "sixth" ;
hwetegves ord-yow "sixteenth" ;
seytegves ord-yow "seventeenth" ;
seythves ord-yow "seventh" ;
etegves ord-yow "eighteenth" ;
nawhes ord-yow "ninth" ;
nawves ord-yow "ninth" ;
udnegves ord-yow "eleventh" ;
unnegves ord-yow "eleventh" ;
dewdhegves ord-yow "twelfth" ;
tredhegves ord-yow "thirteenth" ;
terdhegves ord-yow "thirteenth" ;
pemdhegves ord-yow "fifteenth" ;
trei-ugensves ord-yow "sixtieth" ;
